Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1964
Rules and regulations.

The State Department
of Education and the Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and
promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Step Up to Quality Child
Care Act.

Laws 2013, LB507, § 13.